District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-825.02

Public Advocate for Assessments and Taxation.

[Repealed].

History

May 22, 1997, D.C. Law 11-269, § 2(c), 43 DCR 6868
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-363, § 3(g)(5), 58 DCR 963
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7142, 62 DCR 10905

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-825.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-825.2.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-363, in subsec. (b)(1), substituted “Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia” for “Board of Real Property Assessments and Appeals”.

Temporary Legislation

Temporary addition of § 3a to D.C. Law 11-269: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-825.01.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 7112 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Severability of Law

Severability of D.C. Law 11-269: Section 3 of D.C. Law 11-269 provided: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 11-269: Section 3a of D.C. Law 11-269, as added by § 3 of D.C. Law 12-122, provided that the provisions of the act shall apply to appeals from real property assessments for real property tax year 2000 and for each real property tax year thereafter.

Applicability of D.C. Law 18-363: Section 3a of D.C. Law 18-363, as added by D.C. Law 19-155, § 4, provided: “Sec. 3a. Applicability; transition.

“(a) Sections 2 and 3 shall apply upon Council approval and appointment by the Mayor of a full-time Chairperson and a full-time Vice Chairperson to the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia.

“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor shall appoint the members of the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia with the advice and consent of the Council in accordance with the provisions of section 2(b)(3).”